Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 3. Tranquilizers or Drugs for Livestock.

§ 69-17-101.
Registration of certain instruments.

Every person, except a bona fide merchant, who owns or possesses an instrument designed to project a tranquilizer or drug by means of compressed gas, explosion, or by mechanical means, into livestock for the purpose of rendering the animal docile, by whatever name known, shall register same within thirty days with the commissioner of public safety on forms to be provided by him. Any person hereafter coming into possession of or owning such instrument shall immediately register same with the commissioner of public safety. The commissioner shall make forms available to the general public at all Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol substations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4904-01; Laws, 1962, ch. 167, eff from and after passage (approved April 30, 1962).

§ 69-17-103.
Register of drugs dispensed.

Any person selling or dispensing tranquilizers or drugs manufactured for injection into livestock by means of an instrument identified in Section 69-17-101 for the purpose of rendering livestock docile, shall maintain a register wherein he shall enter the date such drug is sold or dispensed, the name and address of the purchaser or receiver, and the identity and quantity of said drug.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4904-01; Laws, 1962, ch. 167, eff from and after passage (approved April 30, 1962).

§ 69-17-105.
Inspection of drugs dispensed register.

Any sheriff, constable, police officer, highway patrolman, or special investigator authorized under the provisions of Section 69-29-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall have the power to inspect the register of drugs dispensed required to be maintained by this article at a reasonable time during normal business hours of the dispenser or vendor thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4904-01; Laws, 1962, ch. 167, eff from and after passage (approved April 30, 1962).

§ 69-17-107.
Penalties.

Any person who shall violate any provision of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail not less than thirty days nor more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4904-01; Laws, 1962, ch. 167, eff from and after passage (approved April 30, 1962).